Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1806.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 38 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1307. 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion Day.(a) Legislative findings and declarations.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) In November 1944, the United States War Department lifted the ban on African American women in the Womens' Army Corps, leading to the formation of the 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion.(2) The 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion was a unique United States Army unit that had the distinction of being the only all African American all-female battalion to be deployed to the European Theater of Operations during 123456789101112131415161718 World War II.(3) Over 850 African American women, including 824 enlisted and 31 officers, served with the 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion which was commissioned February 1945 to March 1946.(4) The specific mission of the 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion during World War II was to sort and clear a multiyear backlog of mail for the American Army, Navy, Air Force, Red Cross and uniformed civilian specialists stationed in Europe, which represented 7 million individuals awaiting correspondence.(5) The 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion trained at Fort Oglethorpe, Georgia, and learned to:(i) Identify enemy aircraft, ships and weapons.(ii) Climb ropes, jump trenches and crawl under logs wearing gas masks.(iii) Board and evacuate ships.(iv) March long distances with rucksacks.(6) In February 1945, the first contingent of the 6888th embarked from Camp Shank, New York, to sail to Britain and their ship, the Ile de France, survived close encounters with the Nazi U-boats, including a V-1 rocket exploding near the dock causing the women to run and cover, and arrived safely in Glasgow, Scotland.(7) Despite enduring inhumane working conditions, including dark, unheated, rat-infested aircraft hangers with broken windows and air raids, the 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion created a new mail tracking system, worked three separate eight-hour shifts, seven days per week to process an average of 65,000 parcels per shift, or 195,000 20250HB1806PN2220 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 daily parcels, and cleared the six-month backlog of mail in three months.(8) After resolving the immense mail backlog in Birmingham, the 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion sailed to France for their next assignment in Rouen, where they encountered undelivered mail dating back two to three years, which the battalion successfully processed and cleared in three months.(9) After concluding the final assignment in Paris, the last of the 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion returned to the United States aboard the ship Claymont Victory and was disbanded in March 1946 at Fort Dix, New Jersey, with no parades, public appreciation or official recognition of their accomplishments.(10) The 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion was the largest contingent of African-American women to ever serve overseas, dispelled stereotypes and represented a change in racial and gender roles in the military.(11) On February 25, 2009, the 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion was honored by President Barack Obama at the Women in Military Service for America Memorial at Arlington National Cemetery.(12) On November 30, 2018, a monument, inscribed "Women of Determination, Dedication and Distinction" was dedicated in Buffalo Soldier Memorial Park at Fort Leavenworth, Kansas.(13) The 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion was awarded the Women's Army Corps Service Medal, the European African Middle Eastern Campaign Medal, the Army Good Conduct Medal and the World War II Victory Medal.(14) In 2019, the Army awarded the 6888th Central Postal 20250HB1806PN2220 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Directory Battalion the Meritorious Unit Commendation.(15) On March 14, 2022, the Congressional Gold Medal was awarded to members of the Women's Army Corps who were assigned to the 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion.(16) Eighty-one members of the 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion were residents of this Commonwealth at the time of enlistment:(i) Anderson, Jennie V PVT.(ii) Anderson, Love Peace CPL.(iii) Artist, Mary A PFC.(iv) Balls, Louisa PVT.(v) Bastin, Edna PVT.(vi) Bell, Lena Derriecott CPL.(vii) Berks, Blanche Viola PVT.(viii) Berry, Carolyn Morse PVT.(ix) Brooks, Lucille McGhee CPL.(x) Bugg, Vyvyanne Elmore PFC.(xi) Cartwright, Charlotte PVT.(xii) Collins, Florence A PVT.(xiii) Cornwell, Elizabeth H PFC.(xiv) Crews, Frances Vernon PVT.(xv) Crump, Catherine Jane PVT.(xvi) Dabney, Violet PFC.(xvii) Daniel, Rhoda A SGT.(xviii) Dannals, Elsie Alverna PFC.(xix) Davenport, Naomi PFC.(xx) Davis, Ursula Virginia PVT.(xxi) Dean, Freda Mae PVT.(xxii) Dean, Ruth Naomi PVT.(xxiii) Demby, Addie Mae PFC.20250HB1806PN2220 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxiv) Elzie, Marian M PFC.(xxv) Evans, Adele PVT.(xxvi) Ewings, Ophelia Mae PFC.(xxvii) Faulk, Ermayne Sanata PVT.(xxviii) Ferguson, Alvia PVT.(xxix) Ford, Alice Olivia PVT.(xxx) Glover, Arena Theresa T5.(xxxi) Gould, Helen Vivian T5.(xxxii) Gray, Dolores Carolyn SGT.(xxxiii) Green, Thelma Vivian PVT.(xxxiv) Griggs, Hilda Parthenia PVT.(xxxv) Grundy, Marian Rosalie PFC.(xxxvi) Harris, Rosa Mae SGT.(xxxvii) Jackson, Willie Marie PVT.(xxxviii) Jacobs, Isofine PVT.(xxxix) Johnson, Bebe C PVT.(xl) Johnson, Hessie PFC.(xli) Jones, Elaine Viola T5.(xlii) Jordan, Frances C PFC.(xliii) King, Catherine Alice SGT.(xliv) LeSueuer, Evelyn C PFC.(xlv) Lewis, Bernice F PFC.(xlvi) Long, Phyllis Gray PVT.(xlvii) Lucas, Grace Elizabeth PFC.(xlviii) Lucas, Willma Henrietta PVT.(xlix) Mance, Tryphena Teresa PVT.(l) Marsett, Berenice Elisabeth PVT.(li) McNeal, Julia PFC.(lii) Monroe, Mary Priscilla T5.(liii) Moraney, Elizabeth PVT.20250HB1806PN2220 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (liv) Parker, O'Dell PVT.(lv) Patillo, Stella E SGT.(lvi) Perry, Lillie PVT.(lvii) Perry, Nazimova Lee PVT.(lviii) Philpot, Alma Marjorie CPL.(lix) Pinkett, Helen Lee PVT.(lx) Purdy, Thelma Elizabeth PFC.(lxi) Reid, Dorothy Louise PFC.(lxii) Rich, Julia A 2LT.(lxiii) Robinson, Aleese Juanita PFC.(lxiv) Rodgers, Juanita Gertrude PFC.(lxv) Russell, Sarah Olive T5.(lxvi) Smith, Alice Hester PVT.(lxvii) Stewart, Naomi Virginia PVT.(lxviii) Stovall, Janyce Lee PFC.(lxix) Stribbling, Helen DeVon CPL.(lxx) Sullivan, Eleanor Frances PVT.(lxxi) Taylor, Cleola E PVT.(lxxii) Townsend, Margoit Michele PVT.(lxxiii) Warfield, Cornelia Dolores PVT.(lxxiv) Williams, Dorothy Elizabeth T5.(lxxv) Williams, Eunice Viola SSG.(lxxvi) Willis, Alberta Clarteen PVT.(lxxvii) Wilson, Emma M PFC.(lxxviii) Wilson, Ruby Mae PVT.(lxxix) Wood, Hilda E PFC.(lxxx) Wright, Catherine PVT.(lxxxi) Young, Mary Purnell PVT.(b) Designation.--March 9 of each year is designated as 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion Day in this 20250HB1806PN2220 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.(c) Proclamation.--The Governor shall issue annually a proclamation encouraging residents of this Commonwealth to observe 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion Day and to write and mail letters to family, friends, military personnel and veterans to recognize postal employees and the important services these employees provide in connecting us to each other.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1806PN2220 - 7 - 12345678